da: Dele til sminkebord, der følger med: Bænk; Bluetooth-højttaler; Stol; Skuffer; Belysningssæt; Spejl; Hylder; Taburet; Modul med USB/stikkontakt; Sminkebord; Andet
th: รายการสิ่งที่รวมอยู่ในชุดโต๊ะเครื่องแป้งในห้องนอน: ม้านั่งยาว; ลำโพงบลูทูธ; เก้าอี้; ลิ้นชัก; ชุดหลอดไฟ; กระจก; ชั้นวาง; สตูล; โมดูล USB/เต้ารับไฟฟ้า; โต๊ะเครื่องแป้ง; อื่นๆ
fr: Articles de coiffeuse inclus: Banc; Enceinte Bluetooth; Chaise; Tiroirs; Kit d’éclairage; Miroir; Étagères; Tabouret; Module de prises/USB; Coiffeuse; Autre
tr: Makyaj masasının birlikte gelen parçaları: Bank; Bluetooth hoparlör; Sandalye; Çekmeceler; Aydınlatma kiti; Ayna; Raflar; Tabure; USB/güç çıkışı modülü; Makyaj masası; Diğer
cs: Obsažené součásti toaletního stolku: Lavice; Bluetooth reproduktor; Židle; Zásuvky; Osvětlovací sada; Zrcadlo; Police; Stolička; Modul s USB / elektrickou zásuvkou; Toaletní stolek; Jiné
fi: Mukana tulevat makuuhuoneen meikkipöydän tuotteet: Penkki; Bluetooth-kaiutin; Tuoli; Laatikot; Valosarja; Peili; Hyllyt; Jakkara; USB-/pistorasiamoduuli; Kampauspöytä; Muu
es: Artículos incluidos en el tocador de dormitorio: Banco; Altavoz Bluetooth; Silla; Cajones; Kit de iluminación; Espejo; Estantes; Taburete; Módulo de enchufe/USB; Tocador; Otro
hu: Tartalmazza a hálószoba-mosdókagylóelemeket: Pad; Bluetooth-hangszóró; Szék; Fiókok; Világításkészlet; Tükör; Polcok; Zsámoly; USB-/hálózati aljzat modul; Fésülködőasztal; Egyéb
lt-LT: Į komplektą įtraukti miegamojo kosmetinio staliuko elementai: Suoliukas; „Bluetooth“ garsiakalbis; Kėdė; Stalčiai; Apšvietimo rinkinys; Veidrodis; Lentynos; Taburetė; USB / maitinimo lizdo modulis; Tualetinis staliukas; Kita
zh-CN: 卧室梳妆套装包含物品: 长凳; 蓝牙音箱; 椅子; 抽屉; 照明套件; 镜子; 搁架; 凳子; USB/电源插座模块; 梳妆台; 其他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αντικείμενα με το έπιπλο καλλωπισμού υπνοδωματίου: Πάγκος; Ηχείο Bluetooth; Καρέκλα; Συρτάρια; Κιτ φωτισμού; Καθρέπτης; Ράφια; Σκαμπό; Μονάδα πρίζας/USB; Μπουντουάρ; Άλλο
en: Bedroom vanity items included: Bench; Bluetooth speaker; Chair; Drawers; Lighting kit; Mirror; Shelves; Stool; USB/power outlet module; Vanity table; Other
vi: Các vật dụng đi kèm bộ bàn trang điểm phòng ngủ: Ghế dài; Loa Bluetooth; Ghế; Ngăn kéo; Bộ đèn; Gương; Kệ; Đôn; Ổ cắm điện/USB; Bàn trang điểm; Khác
zh-TW: 包含臥室梳妝台品項: 長凳; 藍牙喇叭; 椅子; 抽屜; 照明套組; 鏡子; 層架; 凳子; USB/電源插座模組; 梳妝台; 其他
sk-SK: Toaletná súprava do spálne v cene: Lavica; Reproduktor Bluetooth; Stolička; Zásuvky; Súprava osvetlenia; Zrkadlo; Police; Taburetka; Modul pre USB/zásuvku; Toaletný stolík; Iné
hr-HR: Stavke uključene u toaletni stolić za spavaću sobu: Klupa; Bluetooth zvučnik; Stolica; Ladice; Komplet za osvjetljenje; Ogledalo; Police; Stolčić; Modul za USB / utičnicu; Toaletni stolić; Ostalo
it: Articolo incluso per la toeletta da camera da letto: Panca; Cassa Bluetooth; Sedia; Cassetti; Kit di illuminazione; Specchio; Mensole; Sgabello; Modulo USB/presa di corrente; Toeletta; Altro
bg-BG: Включени елементи към тоалетката за спалня: Пейка; Bluetooth колонка; Стол; Чекмеджета; Комплект за осветление; Огледало; Рафтове; Табуретка; Модул с USB/електрически контакт; Тоалетка; Друго
ko: 포함된 침실 화장대 구성품: 벤치; 블루투스 스피커; 의자; 서랍; 조명 키트; 거울; 선반; 스툴; USB/전원 콘센트 모듈; 화장대; 기타
ja: 寝室の洗面化粧台アイテム付き: ベンチ; Bluetoothスピーカー; チェア; 引き出し; ライティングキット; ミラー; 棚; スツール; USB/電源コンセントモジュール; バニティテーブル; その他
nl: Slaapkameraccessoires items inbegrepen: Bankje; Bluetooth-speaker; Stoel; Lades; Verlichtingsset; Spiegel; Planken; Kruk; USB-/stopcontactmodule; Kaptafel; Overige
de: Enthaltene Artikel im Schlafzimmer-Schminktisch: Sitzbank; Bluetooth-Lautsprecher; Stuhl; Schubladen; Beleuchtungsset; Spiegel; Ablagen; Hocker; USB-/Steckdosenmodul; Schminktisch; Sonstige
pt-PT: Itens de toucador de quarto incluídos: Banco; Coluna Bluetooth; Cadeira; Gavetas; Kit de iluminação; Espelho; Prateleiras; Tamborete; Módulo de tomada/USB; Penteadeira; Outro
pl: Elementy toaletki sypialnianej w zestawie: Ławka; Głośnik Bluetooth; Krzesło; Szuflady; Zestaw oświetlenia; Lustro; Półki; Stołek; Moduł USB / gniazdo zasilania; Toaletka; Inne
pt-BR: Itens de toucador para quarto incluídos: Banco; Alto-falante Bluetooth; Cadeira; Gavetas; Kit de iluminação; Espelho; Prateleiras; Banqueta; Módulo de tomada/USB; Penteadeira; Outros
ro-RO: Articole de toaletă pentru dormitor incluse: Bancă; Boxă Bluetooth; Scaun; Sertare; Kit de iluminat; Oglindă; Rafturi; Taburet; Modul USB/priză; Masă de toaletă; Altele
nb: Soveromsservant inkludert: Benk; Bluetooth-høyttaler; Stol; Skuffer; Belysningssett; Speil; Hyller; Krakk; USB/strømuttak-modul; Sminkebord; Annet
sl-SI: Vključen toaletni kotiček za spalnico: Klop; Zvočnik Bluetooth; Stol; Predali; Komplet za osvetlitev; Ogledalo; Police; Stolček; Modul za USB/vtičnico; Toaletna mizica; Drugo
ru: Аксессуары для туалетного столика в комплекте: Банкетка; Bluetooth-колонка; Стул; Ящики; Комплект освещения; Зеркало; Полки; Табурет; Модуль USB / розетка; Туалетный столик; Другое
sv: Sovrumsartiklar som ingår: Bänk; Bluetooth-högtalare; Stol; Lådor; Belysningskit; Spegel; Hyllor; Pall; USB-/eluttagsmodul; Sminkbord; Övrigt